Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 355, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 355. A. There is hereby created a “State Register of

Historic Places”.

B. The State Historic Preservation Officer, in consultation

with the Oklahoma Historic Preservation Review Committee, shall

establish a listing of sites, districts, structures, buildings,

areas, or objects above or below the surface of the earth whether on

land or in the waters of the state, together with any designated

improvements thereon, significant in the history, architecture,

Req. No. 2195 Page 1

arch eology, or culture of the state, its communities, or the nation.

Such listing shall constitute the Oklahoma State Register of

Historic Places. All historic places within the state listed on or

nominated to the National Register of Historic Places before or

after this act becomes law the effective date of this act shall be

deemed to be listed in the State Register. All historic places

within this state nominated to the National Register of Historic

Places after the effective date of this act shall require the

approval of the Legislature prior to designation on the State

Register.

C. The State Historic Preservation Officer, with the advice of

the Review Committee, shall establish the procedures and the

criteria for listing in the State Register.

D. Listing a privately owned property in the State Register

shall in no way violate or abridge the lawful owner’s right to use,

modify, or dispose of said such property.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2282, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 2282. A. The On or after the effective date of this

act, the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Commission may shall not

establish and or designate state trails on lands under the

jurisdiction of a federal agency when, in the opinion of the federal

agency, such lands may be so developed under the provisions of



Req. No. 2195 Page 2

fede ral law pursuant to 54 U.S.C., Section 300101 et seq. without

the prior approval of the Legislature.

B. Nothing in the Oklahoma Trails System Act shall prevent a

segment of the state trails system from being a part of the National

Scenic or Recreation Trails System. The Commission shall coordinate

the state trails system with the National Trails System and will

encourage and assist any federal studies for inclusion of state

trails into the National Trails System No funds shall be expended or

transferred from the state or a political subdivision towards any

state trails designated pursuant to subsection A of this section

without the prior approval of the Legislature.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-2195 BRC 12/17/2025 10:55:17 AM





















Req. No. 2195 Page 3